Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB524.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 610.050 is amended to read as follows:
If it appears to the court, by affidavit or by sworn testimony, that the child is a danger to
himself, herself, or the community, or is in such condition or surroundings that his or her
welfare is being harmed or threatened with harm to such a degree that his or her best
interest requires that his or her custody be immediately changed by the court from the
original custodian to another, the judge may sign an order giving temporary custody of
the child to a suitable custodian consenting to temporary custody. However, if this case
involves allegations of dependency, neglect, or abuse, no emergency removal or
temporary custody orders shall be effective unless the provisions of KRS Chapter 620 are
followed; and, if the case involves allegations of mental illness, the provisions of KRS
Chapter 645 shall be followed. As a part of such order, the court may direct that the child
shall be taken into custody by the peace officer serving the summons or by any other
peace officer and placed as directed by the court. In any event, a copy of the temporary
custody order shall be served on the parent, guardian or other person exercising custodial
control or supervision of the child when the summons is served. The temporary custody
order shall be effective until the case is heard on its merits or until modified by the court.
As a result of such order, the child shall be placed in custody and care in a home or other
suitable facility.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/28/2026 4:12 PM Jacketed